Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2101.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1541.1. Initiation of suspension of operating privilege.(a) Initiation.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, the department shall initiate a suspension of the operating privilege required under this title no later than six months after the date of sentencing for the offense giving rise to the suspension.(b) Unenforceable suspension.--If a suspension of the operating privilege is imposed more than six months after the date of sentencing for the offense giving rise to the suspension, the suspension shall be unenforceable by the department and in the courts of this Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2101PN2701 - 2 - 1